Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.081

Notice to persons outside state.

(1) Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside this state may be given in a manner prescribed for service of process by the law of the state in which the service is made or given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and may be made in any of the following ways:

(a) Personal delivery outside this state in the manner prescribed for service of process within this state;

(b) By any form of mail addressed to the person to be served and requesting a receipt; or

(c) As directed by the court, including publication if other means of notification are ineffective.

(2) Proof of service outside this state may be made:

(a) By affidavit of the individual who made the service;

(b) In the manner prescribed by the law of this state or the law of the state in which the service is made; or

(c) As directed by the order under which the service is made.

If service is made by mail, proof may be a receipt signed by the addressee or other evidence of delivery to the addressee.

(3) Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

[ 2001 c 65 s 108.]